test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAHL_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AAHL_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AAHL_STEM_2

     skyáahl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: skyáalga
     skyáahl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáalgang
     skyáahl+V+DIRECT+PAST: skyáalgan
     skyáahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: skyáalaa
     skyáahl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: skyáalaan
     skyáahl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: skyáalaas
     skyáahl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: skyáalaa.ang
     skyáahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: skyáalgang
     skyáahl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: skyáalganggang
     skyáahl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: skyáalgangang
     skyáahl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáalgiinii
     skyáahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáalgaangaa
     skyáahl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáalgaangaan
     skyáahl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: skyáalaa'ahlang
     skyáahl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: skyáalaa'ahlanggaa
     skyáahl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: skyáalaa'ahlanggang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: skyáalgang'waa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: skyáalgang'waang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: skyáalgang'waa.ang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: skyáalgang'anggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: skyáalgang'angang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: skyáalgang'ang'waa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: skyáalgang'ang'waang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: skyáalgang'ang'waa.ang
